pl: Zgodny system odrywania: Niekompatybilne; Kompatybilne z systemem roll-off; Kompatybilne z systemami tear-off i roll-off; Kompatybilne z mocowaniem tear-off; Inne
nl: Compatibel afscheursysteem: Niet compatibel; Compatibel met roll-off-systeem; Compatibel met tear-off en roll-off; Compatibel met tear-off-pin; Overige
pt-PT: Sistema destacável compatível: Não compatível; Compatível com sistema roll-off; Compatível com tear-off e roll-off; Compatível com pino de tear-off; Outro
es: Sistema desprendible compatible: No compatible; Compatible con sistema roll-off; Compatible con tear-off y roll-off; Compatible con postes tear-off; Otro
ko: 호환 티어오프 시스템: 호환되지 않음; 롤오프 시스템 호환; 티어오프 및 롤오프 호환; 티어오프 포스트 호환; 기타
sk-SK: Kompatibilný odtrhávací systém: Nekompatibilné; Kompatibilné so systémom Roll-off; Kompatibilné so systémom Tear-off a Roll-off; Kompatibilné so systémom Tear-off; Iné
zh-CN: 适用撕膜系统: 不兼容; 兼容推卷系统; 兼容撕膜和推卷系统; 兼容撕膜柱; 其他
tr: Uyumlu tear-off sistemi: Uyumlu değil; Roll-off sistemi uyumlu; Tear-off ve roll-off uyumlu; Tear-off post uyumlu; Diğer
en: Compatible tear-off system: Not compatible; Roll-off system compatible; Tear-off and roll-off compatible; Tear-off post compatible; Other
ru: Совместимая система отрыва: Несовместимо; Совместимо с системой Roll-off; Совместимо с системами Tear-off и Roll-off; Совместимо с креплениями Tear-off; Другое
it: Sistema tear-off compatibile: Non compatibile; Compatibile con sistema roll-off; Compatibile con tear-off e roll-off; Compatibile con perni per tear-off; Altro
sl-SI: Združljiv listni sistem: Ni združljivo; Združljivo s sistemom Roll-Off; Združljivo s sistemom Tear-Off in Roll-Off; Združljivo z nastavki za Tear-Off; Drugo
zh-TW: 相容快撕除汙膜系統: 不相容; 相容於 Roll-off 系統; 相容於 Tear-off 和 Roll-off 系統; 相容於 Tear-off 柱; 其他
ja: 対応ティアオフシステム: 非対応; ロールオフシステム対応; ティアオフ・ロールオフ対応; ティアオフポスト対応; その他
fi: Yhteensopiva repäisyjärjestelmä: Ei yhteensopiva; Roll-off-yhteensopiva; Tear-off- ja roll-off-yhteensopiva; Tear-off-tappien kanssa yhteensopiva; Muu
th: ระบบฉีกออกที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ไม่รองรับ; รองรับระบบ Roll-off; รองรับทั้ง Tear-off และ Roll-off; รองรับหมุด Tear-off; อื่นๆ
de: Kompatibles Abreißsystem: Nicht kompatibel; Roll-Off-System-kompatibel; Tear-Off- und Roll-Off-kompatibel; Tear-Off-Pin-kompatibel; Sonstige
ro-RO: Sistem compatibil de folii de protecție detașabile: Incompatibil; Compatibil cu sistem roll-off; Compatibil cu tear-off și roll-off; Compatibil cu pinuri tear-off; Altele
vi: Hệ thống kính xé bảo vệ tương thích: Không tương thích; Tương thích với hệ thống cuộn (roll-off); Tương thích với tear-off và roll-off; Tương thích với chốt xé màng (tear-off); Khác
pt-BR: Sistema de remoção compatível: Não compatível; Compatível com sistema roll-off; Compatível com tear-off e roll-off; Compatível com pino de tear-off; Outro
hu: Kompatibilis letéphető rendszer: Nem kompatibilis; Roll-off rendszerrel kompatibilis; Tear-off és roll-off kompatibilis; Tear-off csappal kompatibilis; Egyéb
sv: Kompatibelt rivtåligt system: Ej kompatibel; Kompatibel med roll-off-system; Kompatibel med tear-off och roll-off; Kompatibel med tear-off-piggar; Övrigt
hr-HR: Kompatibilan sustav odljepljivanja gornjeg sloja: Nije kompatibilno; Kompatibilno s "roll-off" sustavom; Kompatibilno s "tear-off" i "roll-off" sustavom; Kompatibilno s nosačima za "tear-off"; Ostalo
fr: Compatible tear-off system: Non compatible; Compatible avec système roll-off; Compatible avec systèmes tear-off et roll-off; Compatible avec picots pour tear-off; Autre
nb: Kompatibelt avrivningssystem: Ikke kompatibel; Kompatibel med roll-off-system; Kompatibel med tear-off- og roll-off-system; Kompatibel med tear-off-feste; Annet
lt-LT: Suderinama nuplėšiamoji sistema: Nesuderinama; Suderinama su „Roll-off“ sistema; Suderinama su nuplėšiamomis plėvelėmis ir „Roll-off“ sistema; Suderinama su nuplėšiamomis plėvelėmis; Kita
cs: Kompatibilní odtrhávací systém: Není kompatibilní; Kompatibilní se systémem roll-off; Kompatibilní se systémem tear-off a roll-off; Kompatibilní s piny tear-off; Jiné
el: Συμβατό σύστημα tear-off: Μη συμβατό; Συμβατό με σύστημα roll-off; Συμβατό με tear-off και roll-off; Συμβατό με βάσεις tear-off; Άλλο
da: Kompatibelt afrivningssystem: Ikke-kompatibel; Kompatibel med roll-off-system; Kompatibel med tear-off og roll-off; Kompatibel med tear-off-post; Andet
bg-BG: Съвместима система за сваляне: Несъвместима; Съвместима с roll-off система; Съвместима с tear-off и roll-off; Съвместима с tear-off щифтове; Друга